Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 10. Enforcement

§ 4991.
Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to provide the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets with the necessary authority to enforce the agricultural water quality requirements of this chapter. When the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets determines that a person subject to the requirements of the chapter is violating a requirement of this chapter, the Secretary shall respond to and require discontinuance of the violation. The Secretary may respond to a violation of the requirements of this chapter by:

issuing a corrective action order under section 4992 of this title;

issuing a cease and desist order under section 4993 of this title;

issuing an emergency order under section 4993 of this title;

revoking or conditioning coverage under a permit or certification under section 4994 of this title;

bringing a civil enforcement action under section 4995 of this title;

referring the violation to the Secretary of Natural Resources for enforcement under 10 V.S.A. chapter 201; or

pursuing other action, such as consulting with a farmer, within the authority of the Secretary to assure discontinuance of the violation and remediation of any harm caused by the violation.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 64

, § 17.

§ 4992.
Corrective actions; administrative enforcement.

When the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets receives a complaint and determines that a farmer is in violation of the requirements of this chapter, rules adopted under this chapter, or a permit or certification issued under this chapter, the Secretary shall notify the farmer of the complaint, including the alleged violation. The Secretary shall not be required to identify the source of the complaint.

When the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets determines that a person is violating the requirements of this chapter, rules adopted under this chapter, or a permit or certification issued under this chapter, the Secretary may issue a written warning that shall be served in person or by certified mail, return receipt requested. A warning issued under this subsection shall include:

a description of the alleged violation;

identification of this section;

identification of the applicable statute, rule, or permit condition violated;

the required corrective actions that the person shall take to correct the violation; and

a summary of federal and State assistance programs that may be utilized by the person to assist in correcting the violation.

A person issued a warning under this section shall have 30 days to respond to the written warning and shall provide an abatement schedule for curing the violation and a description of the corrective action to be taken to cure the violation.

If a person who receives a warning under this subsection fails to respond in a timely manner to the written warning or to take corrective action, the Secretary may act pursuant to section 4993 or section 4995 of this section in order to protect water quality.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 64

, § 17.

§ 4993.
Administrative enforcement; cease and desist orders; emergency orders.

Notwithstanding the requirements of section 4992 of this title, the Secretary at any time may pursue one or more of the following enforcement actions:

Issue a cease and desist order in accordance with the requirements of subsection (b) of this section to a person the Secretary believes to be in violation of the requirements of this chapter.

Issue emergency administrative orders to protect water quality when an alleged violation, activity, or farm practice:

presents an immediate threat of substantial harm to the environment or immediate threat to the public health or welfare;

is likely to result in an immediate threat of substantial harm to the environment or immediate threat to the public health or welfare; or

requires a permit or amendment to a permit issued under this chapter and a farm owner or operator has commenced an activity or is continuing an activity without a permit or permit amendment.

Institute appropriate proceedings on behalf of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets to enforce the requirements of this chapter, rules adopted under this chapter, or a permit or certification issued under this chapter.

Order mandatory corrective actions, including a requirement that the owner or operator of a farm sell or otherwise remove livestock from a farm or production area when the volume of waste produced by livestock on the farm exceeds the infrastructure capacity of the farm or the production area to manage the waste or waste leachate and prevent runoff or leaching of wastes to waters of the State or groundwater, as required by this chapter.

Seek administrative or civil penalties in accordance with the requirements of section 15, 16, 17, or 4995 of this title. Notwithstanding the requirements of section 15 of this title to the contrary, the maximum administrative penalty issued by the Secretary under this section shall not exceed $5,000.00 for each violation, and the maximum amount of any administrative penalty assessed for separate and distinct violations of this chapter shall not exceed $50,000.00.

A person may request that the Secretary hold a hearing on a cease and desist order or an emergency order issued under this section within five days of receipt of the order. Upon receipt of a request for a hearing, the Secretary promptly shall set a date and time for a hearing. A request for a hearing on a cease and desist order or emergency order issued under this section shall not stay the order.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 64

, § 17.

§ 4994.
Permit or certification; revocation; enforcement.

The Secretary may, after due notice and hearing, revoke or condition coverage under a general permit, an individual permit, a small farm certification, or other permit or certification issued under this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter when the person subject to the permit or certification fails to comply with a requirement of this chapter or any term, provision, or requirements of a permit or certification required by this chapter. The Secretary may also seek enforcement remedies and penalties under this subchapter against any person who fails to comply with any term, provision, or requirement of a permit or certification required by this chapter or who violates the terms or conditions of coverage under any general permit, any individual permit, or any certification issued under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 64

, § 17.

§ 4995.
Civil enforcement.

The Secretary may bring an action in the Civil Division of the Superior Court to enforce the requirements of this chapter, or rules adopted under this chapter, or any permit or certification issued under this chapter, to assure compliance, and to obtain penalties in the amounts described in subsection (b) of this section. The action shall be brought by the Attorney General in the name of the State.

The court may grant temporary and permanent injunctive relief, and may:

Enjoin future activities.

Order corrective actions to be taken to mitigate or curtail any violation and to protect human health or the environment, including a requirement that the owner or operator of a farm sell or otherwise remove livestock from the farm or production area when the volume of wastes produced by livestock exceeds the infrastructure capacity of the farm or its production area to manage the waste or waste leachate to prevent runoff or leaching of wastes to waters of the State or groundwater as required by the standards in this chapter.

Order the design, construction, installation, operation, or maintenance of facilities designed to mitigate or prevent a violation of this chapter or to protect human health or the environment or designed to assure compliance.

Fix and order compensation for any public or private property destroyed or damaged.

Revoke coverage under any permit or certification issued under this chapter.

Order reimbursement from any person who caused governmental expenditures for the investigation, abatement, mitigation, or removal of a hazard to human health or the environment.

Levy a civil penalty as provided in this subdivision. A civil penalty of not more than $85,000.00 may be imposed for each violation. In addition, in the case of a continuing violation, a penalty of not more than $42,500.00 may be imposed for each day the violation continues. In fixing the amount of the penalty, the court shall apply the criteria set forth in subsections (e) and (f) of this section. The cost of collection of penalties or other monetary awards shall be assessed against and added to a penalty assessed against a respondent.

In any civil action brought under this section in which a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction is sought, relief shall be obtained upon a showing that there is the probability of success on the merits and that:
(c) (1) In any civil action brought under this section in which a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction is sought, relief shall be obtained upon a showing that there is the probability of success on the merits and that:

a violation exists; or

a violation is imminent and substantial harm is likely to result.

In a civil action brought under this section in which a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction is sought, the Secretary need not demonstrate immediate and irreparable injury, loss, or damage.

Any balancing of the equities in actions under this section may affect the time by which compliance shall be attained, but not the necessity of compliance within a reasonable period of time.

In determining the amount of the penalty provided in subsection (b) of this section, the court shall consider the following:
(e) (1) In determining the amount of the penalty provided in subsection (b) of this section, the court shall consider the following:

the degree of actual or potential impact on public health, safety, welfare, and the environment resulting from the violation;

the presence of mitigating circumstances, including unreasonable delay by the Secretary in seeking enforcement;

whether the respondent knew or had reason to know the violation existed;

the respondent’s record of compliance;

the deterrent effect of the penalty;

the State’s actual costs of enforcement; and

the length of time the violation has existed.

In determining the amount of the penalty provided in subsection (b) of this section, the court may consider additional relevant factors.

In addition to any penalty assessed under subsection (b) of this section, the Secretary may also recapture economic benefit resulting from a violation.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 64

, § 17.

§ 4996.
Appeals; enforcement.

Any person subject, under this subchapter, to an administrative enforcement order, an administrative penalty, or revocation of a permit or certification who is aggrieved by a final decision of the Secretary may appeal to the Civil Division of Superior Court within 30 days of the decision. The Chief Superior judge may specially assign an Environmental judge to the Civil Division of Superior Court for the purpose of hearing an appeal.

If the Secretary issues an emergency order under this chapter, the person subject to the order may request a hearing before the Civil Division of Superior Court. Notice of the request for hearing under this subdivision shall be filed with the Civil Division of Superior Court and the Secretary within five business days of receipt of the order. A hearing on the emergency order shall be held at the earliest possible time and shall take precedence over all other hearings. The hearing shall be held within five business days of receipt of the notice of the request for hearing. A request for hearing on an emergency order shall not stay the order. The Civil Division of the Superior Court shall issue a decision within five business days from the conclusion of the hearing, and no later than 30 days from the date the notice of request for hearing was received by the person subject to the order.

The Civil Division of the Superior Court shall review appeals under this section on the record pursuant to Rule 74 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 64

, § 17; amended

2017, No. 11

, § 2.